src/fst/morphology/stems/conjunctions.lexc
LEXICON beziehungsweise__cnjcoo
+CC: # ;

LEXICON anstatt__cnjsub
+CS: # ;

LEXICON als__cnjadv
! FIXME
+CS: # ;

LEXICON Conjunction


aber:aber beziehungsweise__cnjcoo ;
beziehungsweise:beziehungsweise beziehungsweise__cnjcoo ;
desto:desto beziehungsweise__cnjcoo ;
doch:doch beziehungsweise__cnjcoo ;
entweder:entweder beziehungsweise__cnjcoo ;
es% sei% denn:es% sei% denn beziehungsweise__cnjcoo ;
indessen:indessen beziehungsweise__cnjcoo ;
oder:oder beziehungsweise__cnjcoo ;
sondern:sondern beziehungsweise__cnjcoo ;
sowenig:sowenig beziehungsweise__cnjcoo ;
sowie:sowie beziehungsweise__cnjcoo ;
sowohl:sowohl beziehungsweise__cnjcoo ;
und:und beziehungsweise__cnjcoo ;
weder:weder beziehungsweise__cnjcoo ;
als% ob:als% ob anstatt__cnjsub ;
anstatt:anstatt anstatt__cnjsub ;
ausgenommen:ausgenommen anstatt__cnjsub ;
bevor:bevor anstatt__cnjsub ;
bis:bis anstatt__cnjsub ;
da:da anstatt__cnjsub ;
damit:damit anstatt__cnjsub ;
dass:dass anstatt__cnjsub ;
daß:daß anstatt__cnjsub ;
demzufolge:demzufolge anstatt__cnjsub ;
ehe:ehe anstatt__cnjsub ;
falls:falls anstatt__cnjsub ;
indem:indem anstatt__cnjsub ;
inwiefern:inwiefern anstatt__cnjsub ;
nachdem:nachdem anstatt__cnjsub ;
noch:noch anstatt__cnjsub ;!-- weder ... noch --
ob:ob anstatt__cnjsub ;
obgleich:obgleich anstatt__cnjsub ;
obschon:obschon anstatt__cnjsub ;
obwohl:obwohl anstatt__cnjsub ;
ohne:ohne anstatt__cnjsub ;
seit:seit anstatt__cnjsub ;
seitdem:seitdem anstatt__cnjsub ;
sobald:sobald anstatt__cnjsub ;
sodass:sodass anstatt__cnjsub ;
sofern:sofern anstatt__cnjsub ;
solange:solange anstatt__cnjsub ;
soweit:soweit anstatt__cnjsub ;
statt:statt anstatt__cnjsub ;
um:um anstatt__cnjsub ;
wann:wann anstatt__cnjsub ;
weil:weil anstatt__cnjsub ;
wenn:wenn anstatt__cnjsub ;
wenngleich:wenngleich anstatt__cnjsub ;
wiewohl:wiewohl anstatt__cnjsub ;
wo:wo anstatt__cnjsub ;
wohin:wohin anstatt__cnjsub ;
wohingegen:wohingegen anstatt__cnjsub ;
worauf:worauf anstatt__cnjsub ;
worin:worin anstatt__cnjsub ;
als:als als__cnjadv ;
als% ob:als% ob als__cnjadv ;
denn:denn als__cnjadv ;
jedoch:jedoch als__cnjadv ;
nichtsdestoweniger:nichtsdestoweniger als__cnjadv ;
während:während als__cnjadv ;
wie:wie als__cnjadv ;
womit:womit als__cnjadv ;
